Alaska statutes. Title 15. Elections.
Chapter 07. Registration of Voters.

Editor’s notes. —

The provisions of this chapter refer to 42 U.S.C. 1973 et seq., (National Voter Registration Act of 1993), which was renumbered in 2014 as 52 U.S.C. 10101, et seq., by the U.S. House of Representatives, Office of Law Revision Counsel.

Collateral references. —

25 Am. Jur. 2d, Elections, § 1 et seq.

29 C.J.S., Elections, §§ 36-52.

Sec. 15.07.010.
Who may vote.

The precinct election officials at any election shall allow a person to vote whose name is on the official registration list for that precinct and who is qualified under AS 15.05. A person whose name is not on the official registration list shall be allowed to vote a questioned ballot.

History.

(§ 2 ch 211 SLA 1968; am § 5 ch 116 SLA 1972; am § 5 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 3 ch 82 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For absentee and questioned voting, see 6 AAC 25, art. 3.

Sec. 15.07.020.
Registration as a prerequisite. [Repealed, § 231 ch 100 SLA 1980.]

Sec. 15.07.030.
Who may register.

A person who has the qualifications of a voter as set out in AS

15.05.010

(1) — (3) or who will have the qualifications at the succeeding primary or general election is entitled to be registered as a voter in the precinct in which the person resides.

A person qualified under AS

15.05.011

to vote by absentee ballot in a federal election is entitled to be registered as a voter in the house district in which the person resided immediately before departure from the United States.

History.

(§ 2 ch 211 SLA 1968; am § 19 ch 32 SLA 1971; am § 6 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 29 ch 21 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For absentee and questioned voting, see 6 AAC 25, art. 3.

Sec. 15.07.040.
Time for registration.

A person who is qualified under AS

15.05.010

(1) — (3) is entitled to register at any time throughout the year except that a person under 18 years of age may register at any time within 90 days immediately preceding the person’s 18th birthday.

History.

(§ 2 ch 211 SLA 1968; am § 20 ch 32 SLA 1971; am § 6 ch 116 SLA 1972; am § 7 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 30 ch 21 SLA 2000)

Sec. 15.07.050.
Manner of registration; party affiliation.

Registration may be made

in person before a registration official or through a voter registration agency;

by another individual on behalf of the voter if the voter has executed a written general power of attorney or a written special power of attorney authorizing that other individual to register the voter;

by mail;

by facsimile transmission, scanning, or another method of electronic transmission that the director approves; or

by completing a permanent fund dividend application under AS

43.23.015

.

Except as provided in (c) of this section, only the voter or the individual authorized by the voter in a written power of attorney under (a) of this section may mark the voter’s choice of party affiliation on the voter registration application form.

A person may supply a voter registration application form with a political party or group affiliation indicated to a voter only if the voter is already registered as affiliated with the political party or group indicated.

History.

(§ 2 ch 211 SLA 1968; am § 4 ch 111 SLA 1994; am § 1 ch 86 SLA 1996; am §§ 4, 5 ch 2 FSSLA 2005; am § 2, 2016 General Election Ballot Measure No. 1)

Cross references. —

For findings and intent for the 2016 [effective in 2017] changes to subsection (a), see sec. 1 of 2016 General Election Ballot Measure No. 1.

Administrative Code. —

For absentee and questioned voting, see 6 AAC 25, art. 3.

Sec. 15.07.055.
Voter registration agencies.

The following agencies are designated voter registration agencies:

the administrative component of the Department of Administration that administers motor vehicle and driver’s license laws;

divisions of the Department of Health and Social Services that provide public assistance through the food stamp program, Medicaid program, Special Supplemental Food Program for Women, Infants, and Children (WIC), and Alaska temporary assistance program;

the division of the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development that is responsible for municipal and regional assistance programs; and

all recruitment offices of the armed forces of the United States located in Alaska.

The director shall designate state-funded agencies that primarily provide services to persons with disabilities as voter registration agencies.

The director may designate other state or local agencies as voter registration agencies. The director may designate a federal or nongovernmental office as a voter registration agency with the agreement of that office.

A voter registration agency shall distribute voter registration materials, assist applicants in completing voter registration forms, and accept and transmit completed voter registration forms to the director in accordance with regulations adopted by the director to comply with 42 U.S.C. 1973gg (National Voter Registration Act of 1993) and other requirements of federal law.

The director shall enter into an agreement with the Department of Administration and the Department of Revenue to match identifying information provided by a voter with existing identification records

maintained by the administrative component of the Department of Administration that administers motor vehicle and driver’s license laws and by the administrative component of the Department of Revenue that administers the permanent fund dividend laws; and

bearing the same identifying number, name, and date of birth provided on the registration.

History.

(§ 5 ch 111 SLA 1994; am § 8 ch 107 SLA 1996; am E.O. No. 99 § 14 (1997); am § 1 ch 113 SLA 2003; am § 1 ch 13 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

In 1999, in paragraph (a)(3) of this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was substituted for “Department of Community and Regional Affairs” in accordance with § 91(a)(3), ch. 58, SLA 1999. In 2004, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” in (a)(3) of this section, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective May 28, 2016, in (e), deleted “who initially registers by mail or by facsimile or other electronic transmission approved by the director under AS

15.07.050

” preceding “with existing identification”.

Editor's notes. —

The provisions of this chapter refer to 42 U.S.C. 1973 et seq., (National Voter Registration Act of 1993), which was renumbered in 2014 as 52 U.S.C. 10101, et seq., by the U.S. House of Representatives, Office of Law Revision Counsel.

Sec. 15.07.060.
Required registration information.

Each applicant who requests registration or reregistration shall supply the following information:

the applicant’s name and sex;

if issued, the applicant’s State of Alaska driver’s license number or State of Alaska identification card number, or the last four digits of the applicant’s social security number;

the applicant’s date of birth;

the applicant’s Alaska residence address;

a statement of whether the applicant has previously been registered to vote in another jurisdiction, and, if so, the jurisdiction and the address of the previous registration;

a declaration that the applicant will be 18 years of age or older within 90 days after the date of registration;

a declaration that the applicant is a citizen of the United States;

the date of application;

the applicant’s signature or mark;

any former name under which the applicant was registered to vote in the state;

an attestation that the information provided by the applicant in (1) — (10) of this subsection is true; and

a certification that the applicant understands that a false statement on the application may make the applicant subject to prosecution for a misdemeanor under this title or AS 11.

If the applicant has been previously registered to vote in another jurisdiction, the director shall notify the chief elections officer in that jurisdiction that the applicant has registered to vote in Alaska and request that that jurisdiction cancel the applicant’s voter registration there.

Each applicant who requests registration in person before a registration official shall exhibit one form of identification to the official, including a driver’s license, state identification card, current and valid photo identification, birth certificate, passport, or hunting or fishing license. A registration official who knows the identity of the applicant may waive the identification requirement.

If the applicant requests reregistration, the applicant shall supply under oath any former name under which the applicant was registered to vote in the state.

For an applicant requesting initial registration by mail, by facsimile or other electronic transmission approved by the director under AS

15.07.050

, or by completing a permanent fund dividend application, the director shall verify the information provided in compliance with (a)(2) and (3) of this section through state agency records described in AS

15.07.055(e)

. If the applicant cannot comply with the requirement of (a)(2) of this section because the applicant has not been issued any of the listed numbers, the applicant may instead submit a copy of one of the following forms of identification: a driver’s license, state identification card, current and valid photo identification, birth certificate, passport, or hunting or fishing license.

If an applicant who requests registration cannot comply with the requirement of (a)(2) of this section because the applicant has not been issued any of the listed numbers, the division shall assign the applicant a unique identifying number.

History.

(§ 2 ch 211 SLA 1968; am § 21 ch 32 SLA 1971; am §§ 6, 7 ch 197 SLA 1975; am § 8 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 67 SLA 1989; am § 2 ch 86 SLA 1996; am §§ 2 — 5 ch 113 SLA 2003; am § 6 ch 2 FSSLA 2005; am § 3, 2016 General Election Ballot Measure No. 1)

Revisor's notes. —

2016 General Election Ballot Measure No. 1 changed some language in subsection (e) without indicating that it was amending existing statutory language, despite the fact that it also made changes to (e) that did indicate amendments to existing statutory language. Specifically, in the first sentence, the "," following "mail" and the "or" before "by completing", were added by the initiative without an indication that this changed existing statutory language. The legal effect of this is uncertain. The revisor has given effect to the changes that were not indicated and the changes that were indicated in the text of subsection (e) above.

Cross references. —

For findings and intent for the 2016 [effective in 2017] changes to subsection (e), see sec. 1 of 2016 General Election Ballot Measure No. 1.

Administrative Code. —

For absentee and questioned voting, see 6 AAC 25, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective March 1, 2017, in (e), added "by completing a permanent fund dividend application" and made related changes.

Sec. 15.07.064.
Information required for voter registration.

A voter requesting registration or reregistration shall provide the director with sufficient information to determine

the location of the residence of the voter within the district;

the precinct in which the voter is qualified to vote;

the other local or regional election jurisdictions in which the voter is eligible to vote.

In determining the sufficiency of the registration information provided by the voter in an application to register, the director may consider

whether the voter is applying in person, by mail from a location within the state, or by mail from a location outside the state;

the location, size, or density of the population within the municipality, established village, or geographic area in which the voter claims residence;

whether the municipality, established village, or geographic area has been divided into precincts or local or regional election subdivisions;

whether specific locations within the municipality, established village, or geographic area have been identified by street name, subdivisions, or other commonly known official descriptions; or

other circumstances considered significant by the director.

A voter requesting registration in a municipality or established village that has been divided into more than one precinct or that includes more than one section of a local or regional election subdivision shall provide the director with information that describes the location of the residence of the voter. In this subsection, the use of a post office box, a postal service center box, a rural route number, general delivery, or other description identified only as a mailing address does not establish the residence of the voter. In addition to the name of the municipality or established village, the voter shall provide the director with information that describes a physical location that may be

a street name, including a number on the street if one exists;

a highway name and mile post number;

a mobile home court and space number;

a boat harbor and slip number;

the name of a subdivision;

the name of a building, institution, military or other reservation for which the location is fixed; or

another descriptive phrase from which the specific physical location of the residence of the voter within the municipality or established village can be determined.

The director is not required to request a voter who claims residence within a municipality or established village to provide the information required under (c) of this section if

the municipality or established village is entirely within a single precinct; and

a local or regional election subdivision is not divided into sections within the boundaries of the municipality or the area of the established village.

The director shall review the information contained within an application by a voter for registration. The director may not reject an application of a voter who qualifies under (d) of this section because the voter provided information in excess of that required to establish qualifications, including excess information qualifying as a mailing address. The director may consider an application for registration within a municipality or established village described in (d) of this section to comply with law based on other information contained in the application, including evidence that

the application was made in person before a voting registrar, election official, or absentee voting official appointed to serve in the municipality or established village;

the application of a voter registering by mail was postmarked by the postal official in the municipality or established village; and

other information contained in the application does not negate the presumption of residency provided under (a) of this section.

A voter who resides in a building, institution, military or other reservation may establish residency for voting purposes by naming that place instead of naming a municipality or established village. In this subsection the use of a post office box, a postal service center box, a rural route number, general delivery, or other description qualifying as a mailing address does not establish the residence of the voter. The director is not required to request a voter who claims residence by naming the building, institution, military or other reservation to provide the information required under (c) of this section if

the physical location of the place named in the application is fixed; and

the place named in the application is contained within the boundaries of a single precinct.

Notwithstanding (a) — (f) of this section, the director may substitute a mailing address provided by the voter for the permanent fund dividend program under AS 43.23 as the mailing address for the voter on the registration records of the director under procedures specified in regulations of the director if necessary to maintain accuracy of voting registration records.

In this section, “established village” means an unincorporated community that is in

the unorganized borough and that has 25 or more permanent residents; or

an organized borough, has 25 or more permanent residents, and

is on a road system and is located more than 50 miles outside the boundary limits of a unified municipality, or

is not on a road system and is located more than 15 miles outside the boundary limits of a unified municipality.

History.

(§ 1 ch 115 SLA 1990; am § 6 ch 111 SLA 1994; am § 60 ch 101 SLA 1995; am §§ 4, 5 ch 82 SLA 2000)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2000, in subsection (h), the paragraphs were renumbered to conform to the style of the Alaska Statutes.

Subsection (g) was enacted as (h).
Relettered in 2000, at which time former (g) was relettered as (h). In 2010, in subsection (g), “(a) — (f)” was substituted for “(a) — (g)” to reflect the 2000 relettering of subsection (g).

Administrative Code. —

For absentee and questioned voting, see 6 AAC 25, art. 3.

Sec. 15.07.065.
Exchange of voter registration information. [Repealed, § 231 ch 100 SLA 1980.]

Sec. 15.07.070.
Procedure for registration.

The director may adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) relating to the registration of voters consistent with the requirements of this section and federal law, including 42 U.S.C. 1973gg (National Voter Registration Act of 1993).

To register by mail or by facsimile, scanning, or other electronic transmission approved by the director under AS

15.07.050

, the director, the area election supervisor, or a voter registration agency shall furnish, at no cost to the voter, forms prepared by the director on which the registration information required under AS

15.07.060

shall be inserted by the voter, by a person on behalf of the voter if that person is designated to act on behalf of the voter in a power of attorney, or by a person on behalf of the voter if the voter is physically incapacitated. The director may require proof of identification of the applicant as required by regulations adopted by the director under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act). Upon receipt and approval of the completed registration forms, the director or the election supervisor shall forward to the voter an acknowledgment, and the voter’s name shall immediately be placed on the master register. If the registration is denied, the voter shall immediately be informed in writing that registration was denied and the reason for denial. When identifying information has been provided by the voter as required by this chapter, the election supervisor shall forward to the voter a registration card.

The names of persons submitting completed registration forms by mail that are postmarked at least 30 days before the next election, or submitting completed registration forms by facsimile or other electronic transmission approved by the director under AS

15.07.050

that are received at least 30 days before the next election, shall be placed on the official registration list for that election. If a registration form received by mail less than 30 days before an election does not have a legible and dated postmark, the name of the person submitting the form shall be placed on the official registration list for that election if the form was signed and dated by the person at least 30 days before the election and if the form is received by the director or election supervisor at least 25 days before the election. The name of a person submitting a completed registration form by mail or by facsimile or other electronic transmission that does not meet the applicable requirements of this subsection may not be placed on the official registration list for that election but shall be placed on the master register after that election.

Qualified voters may register in person before a registration official or through a voter registration agency at any time throughout the year, except that a person registering within 30 days preceding an election is not eligible to vote at that election. Upon receipt and approval of the registration forms, the director or the election supervisor shall forward to the voter an acknowledgment in the form of a registration card, and the voter’s name shall immediately be placed on the master register. Names of persons registering 30 or more days before an election shall be placed on the official registration list for that election.

[Repealed, § 38 ch 116 SLA 1972.]

Incomplete or inaccurate registration forms may not be accepted. A person who submitted an incomplete or inaccurate registration form may register by reexecuting and resubmitting a registration form in person, by mail, or by facsimile or other electronic transmission approved by the director under AS

15.07.050

. The requirements of (c) or (d) of this section apply to a registration form resubmitted under this subsection. Notwithstanding the foregoing, an application made under AS

43.23.015

that contains the information required by AS

15.07.060(a)(1)

— (4) and (7) — (9), and an attestation that such information is true, shall not be deemed an incomplete registration form and shall be accepted in accordance with AS

15.07.070(i)

.

The director shall provide voter registration forms prepared under (b) of this section to voter registration agencies designated under AS

15.07.055

for distribution to the public.

The director shall design the form of the voter’s certificate appearing on the envelope that is used for voting an absentee in-person or questioned ballot so that all information required for registration by AS

15.07.060(a)

may be obtained from a voter who votes an absentee in-person or questioned ballot. If the voter voting an absentee in-person or questioned ballot has completed all information on the voter registration portion of the absentee in-person or questioned ballot voter’s certificate, the director shall place the name of the voter on the official registration list.

The division shall register voters who submit an application to receive a permanent fund dividend in accordance with (j) — (m) of this section.

The division shall cooperate with the Department of Revenue under AS

43.23.101

to ensure that the permanent fund dividend application form furnished by the Department of Revenue under AS

43.23.015

allows an applicant, a person who is designated in a power of attorney to act on behalf of an applicant, or a person acting on behalf of a physically disabled applicant to submit voter registration information required under AS

15.07.060(a)(1)

— (4) and (7) — (9), and an attestation that such information is true. The director may require proof of identification of the applicant, if not already in the Department of Revenue's possession, as required by regulations adopted by the director under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

Upon receipt of the registration information, the director shall, as soon as practicable and in accordance with a schedule established by the director by rule, notify by United States mail and any other means authorized by the director, each applicant not already registered to vote at the address provided in the applicant's application

of the processes to

decline to be registered as a voter;

maintain an existing voter registration or be newly registered at a valid place of residence not provided in the applicant's application; and

adopt a political party affiliation; and

that failure to respond to the notification shall constitute the applicant's consent to cancel any registration to vote in another jurisdiction.

If an applicant does not decline to be registered as a voter within 30 calendar days after the director issues the notification, the application under AS

43.23.015

will constitute a completed registration form. The name of the applicant shall be placed on the master register if the director determines that the person is qualified to vote under AS

15.05.010

, and the director shall forward to the applicant a registration card. If registration is denied, the applicant shall immediately be informed in writing that registration was denied and the reason for denial.

Any person who is not eligible to vote and who becomes registered under this provision through human or mechanical error shall not be found on that basis to have had the intent to unlawfully register to vote.

History.

(§ 2 ch 211 SLA 1968; am § 8 ch 71 SLA 1972; am §§ 7, 38 ch 116 SLA 1972; am § 9 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 62 ch 6 SLA 1984; am § 2 ch 47 SLA 1989; am §§ 2, 3 ch 67 SLA 1989; am § 7 ch 111 SLA 1994; am § 1 ch 58 SLA 1995; am §§ 3 — 6 ch 86 SLA 1996; am §§ 6 — 8 ch 113 SLA 2003; am § 7 ch 2 FSSLA 2005; am §§ 4, 5, 2016 General Election Ballot Measure No. 1)

Revisor's notes. —

Subsections (i) — (m) were added by 2016 General Election Ballot Measure No. 1 as a single subsection with multiple paragraphs. To conform the initiative to the style of the Alaska Statutes the paragraphs were relettered as subsections and minor editorial changes were made, including substituting “United States” for “U.S.”.

In 2018, “AS

43.23.101

” was substituted for “43.23.016” in subsection (j) to reflect the renumbering of that section.

Cross references. —

For findings and intent for the 2016 [effective in 2017] changes to subsection (f) and the addition of subsections (i) — (m), see sec. 1 of 2016 General Election Ballot Measure No. 1.

Administrative Code. —

For absentee and questioned voting, see 6 AAC 25, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective March 1, 2017, added the last sentence of (f), added (i) — (m).

Editor's notes. —

The provisions of this chapter refer to 42 U.S.C. 1973 et seq., (National Voter Registration Act of 1993), which was renumbered in 2014 as 52 U.S.C. 10101, et seq., by the U.S. House of Representatives, Office of Law Revision Counsel.

Sec. 15.07.075.
Voters unaffiliated with a political party.

The director shall consider a voter to be a voter registered as

“nonpartisan” and without a preference for a political party if the voter registers as nonpartisan on a voter registration form;

“undeclared” if the voter

registers as undeclared on a voter registration form;

fails to declare an affiliation with a political group or political party on a voter registration form; or

declares an affiliation with an entity other than a political party or political group on a voter registration form; or

“other” if the voter declares on a voter registration form an affiliation with a political group.

History.

(§ 8 ch 2 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 15.07.080.
Registration officials to serve during the 1968 primary and general election. [Repealed, § 38 ch 116 SLA 1972.]

Sec. 15.07.081.
Registration officials.

The director shall appoint one or more registration officials to serve in each precinct polling place in all elections during the hours the polling places are open. An election official appointed under AS 15.10 may also serve as a registration official.

History.

(§ 1 ch 197 SLA 1975; am § 10 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 6 ch 82 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For absentee and questioned voting, see 6 AAC 25, art. 3.

Sec. 15.07.090.
Voting after change of name; reregistration; amendment or transfer of registration.

A voter whose name is changed by marriage or court order may vote under the previous name, but a voter who desires to use a new name shall vote a questioned ballot.

A voter shall reregister if the voter’s registration is cancelled as provided in AS

15.07.130

. The reregistration is effective for the next election that occurs at least 30 days after the date of reregistration.

The director shall transfer the registration of a voter from one precinct to another within a house district when requested by the voter. The request shall be made 30 or more days before the election day. The director shall transfer the registration of a voter from one house district to another when requested by the voter. The voter must reside in the new house district for at least 30 days in order to vote.

A person who claims to be a registered voter, but for whom no evidence of registration in the precinct can be found, shall be granted the right to vote in the same manner as that of a questioned voter and the ballot shall be treated in the same manner. The ballot shall be considered to be a “questioned ballot” and shall be so designated. The director or the director’s representative shall determine whether the voter is registered in the house district before counting the ballot. A voter who has failed to obtain a transfer as provided in (c) of this section shall vote a “questioned ballot” in the precinct in which the voter resides.

History.

(§ 2 ch 211 SLA 1968; am §§ 8, 9 ch 116 SLA 1972; am §§ 1, 2 ch 38 SLA 1974; am §§ 9 — 11 ch 197 SLA 1975; am §§ 11, 12 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 32 ch 59 SLA 1982; am § 4 ch 67 SLA 1989; am § 8 ch 111 SLA 1994; am §§ 31, 32 ch 21 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For absentee and questioned voting, see 6 AAC 25, art. 3.

Sec. 15.07.100.
Registration officials.

A registration official shall be a qualified state voter and shall take an oath to honestly, faithfully, and promptly perform the duties of the office.

Training for registration officials shall be provided by the director. On the completion of training, the director may require that officials demonstrate their competence by a test or other method.

A registration official serves at the pleasure of the director. Each registration official shall be periodically evaluated by the director based on the completeness of the registration forms, timely filing of registration forms, and the voter registration activity attributed to the registration official.

A registration official shall transmit completed voter registration forms to the election supervisor within five days following completion by the voter.

History.

(§ 2 ch 211 SLA 1968; am § 13 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 7 ch 82 SLA 2000)

Sec. 15.07.110.
Payment for registration. [Repealed, § 22 ch. 58 SLA 1995.]

Sec. 15.07.120.
Custody of registers.

A master register shall at all times remain in the custody of the director. The person who is the area election supervisor shall likewise maintain a register of all voters within the precincts of the area house district that person supervises.

History.

(§ 2 ch 211 SLA 1968; am § 15 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 33 ch 21 SLA 2000)

Sec. 15.07.125.
Official registration list.

The director shall prepare an official registration list for each election consisting of the names of (1) all voters whose registrations are not inactive; and (2) all voters whose names are required to be placed on the list by AS

15.07.070(c)

or (d). A list of persons eligible to vote in each precinct at that election shall be prepared from the official registration list.

History.

(§ 16 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 9 ch 111 SLA 1994)

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter on SB 303, which became ch. 111, SLA 1994, and amended this section, see 1994 Senate Journal 2793 — 2796.

Sec. 15.07.127.
Preparation of master register.

The director shall prepare both a statewide list and a list by precinct of the names and addresses of all persons whose names appear on the master register and their political party affiliation. Subject to the limitations of AS

15.07.195

, any person may obtain a copy of the list, or a part of the list, or an electronic format containing both residence and mailing addresses of voters, by applying to the director and paying to the state treasury a fee as determined by the director.

History.

(§ 7 ch 86 SLA 1996; am § 9 ch 2 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 15.07.130.
Voter registration list maintenance.

Periodically, at times of the director’s choosing, but no less frequently than in January of each calendar year, the director shall examine the master register maintained under AS

15.07.120

and shall send, by nonforwardable mail to the voter’s registration mailing address, a notice requesting address confirmation or correction to each voter

whose mail from the division has been returned to the division in the two years immediately preceding the examination of the register;

who has not contacted the division in the two years immediately preceding the examination of the register; or

who has not voted or appeared to vote in the two general elections immediately preceding the examination of the register.

If a registered voter has not, within the preceding four calendar years, contacted the division and has neither voted nor appeared to vote in a local, regional school board, primary, special, or general election during the last four calendar years and a notice sent to the voter under (a) of this section was returned as undeliverable, the voter shall be advised by a notice sent by forwardable mail to the voter’s last known address that registration will be inactivated unless the voter responds to the notice no later than 45 days after the date of the notice sent under this section. The director shall maintain on the master register the name of a voter whose registration is inactivated. The director shall cancel a voter’s inactive registration in accordance with the procedures set out in 42 U.S.C. 1973gg-6 (sec. 8, National Voter Registration Act of 1993) after the second general election that occurs after the registration becomes inactive if the voter does not contact the division or vote or appear to vote.

The director shall obtain from the bureau of vital statistics a certified list of all residents over 18 years of age who have died or who have been presumptively declared dead. Promptly after receipt of each list, but, in any event, at least once each month, the director shall cancel the registration of all deceased voters.

The notice sent under (b) of this section must include a postage prepaid and pre-addressed return card on which the voter may state the voter’s current address. The notice must indicate

that the voter should return the card not later than 45 days after the date of the notice if the voter did not change residence;

that failure to return the card by the 45-day deadline could result in removal of the voter’s name from the official registration list for a subsequent election;

that the voter’s registration will be cancelled if the voter does not contact the division during, or vote or appear to vote in an election held during, the period beginning on the date of the notice and ending on the day after the last day of the fourth calendar year that occurs after the date of notice; and

how the voter can continue to be eligible to vote if the voter has changed residence.

For purposes of (b) and (d) of this section, a voter “appears to vote” if

the voter is present at a polling place or at an absentee voting station at a time when the polling place or absentee voting station is operating, for the purpose of casting a vote;

the voter applies to the division to obtain an absentee ballot; or

in an election conducted by mail under AS

15.20.800

, a voter who has not received a ballot by mail makes a timely request to the division for a ballot.

For the purpose of this section, a voter “contacts” the division if the voter notifies the division of a change of address, responds to a notice sent under this section, signs a petition for a ballot measure, requests a new voter registration card, or otherwise communicates with the division other than to vote or register to vote.

History.

(§ 2 ch 211 SLA 1968; am § 22 ch 32 SLA 1971; am § 4 ch 38 SLA 1974; am §§ 17, 18 ch 100 SLA 1980; am §§ 10, 11 ch 111 SLA 1994; am §§ 8 — 11 ch 86 SLA 1996; am §§ 1 — 4 ch 63 SLA 1998)

Sec. 15.07.135.
Cancellation of registration of convicted persons.

The director shall make reasonable efforts to obtain the names of persons convicted of a felony involving moral turpitude. Promptly after receipt of evidence satisfactory to the director that a person has been convicted of a felony involving moral turpitude, the director shall cancel the registration of the person.

Upon presenting proof that a person whose registration was canceled under (a) of this section has been unconditionally discharged from custody, the person may register. The director shall make reasonable efforts to verify the unconditional discharge of persons applying for registration under this subsection.

History.

(§ 19 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 85 SLA 1986; am § 12 ch 86 SLA 1996)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

15.07.130(d)

. Renumbered in 1980.

Cross references. —

For voter disqualification for felony conviction, see AS

15.05.030

; for definition of “felony involving moral turpitude,” see AS

15.80.010

; for definition of “unconditional discharge,” see AS

15.80.010

.

Collateral references. —

What constitutes “conviction” within constitutional or statutory provision disfranchising one convicted of crime. 36 ALR2d 1238.

Effect of conviction under federal law, or law of another state or country, on right to vote or hold public office. 39 ALR3d 303.

What constitutes conviction within statutory or constitutional provision making conviction of crime ground of disqualification for, removal from, or vacancy in, public office. 10 ALR5th 139.

Sec. 15.07.137.
Voting information from municipalities.

Within 60 days after each election held in a municipality, the municipal clerk shall certify and send to the director the official registration list containing the names, residence addresses, and voter identification numbers of all persons voting in each precinct in that election. The names of the persons who voted in the municipal election shall be indicated on the official registration list sent to the director by the municipal clerk.

History.

(§ 19 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 12 ch 12 SLA 2006)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

15.07.130(e)

. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 15.07.140.
General administrative supervision by director.

The director shall provide general administrative supervision over the registration and reregistration of voters. The director shall, no later than 120 days before any general election, arrange to have the list of registered voters in a usable electronic format provided free of charge to each political party. Upon request by the mayor or manager of a municipality, the director shall furnish registration information for all precincts all or part of which are within the boundaries of the local government unit.

History.

(§ 2 ch 211 SLA 1968; am § 10 ch 116 SLA 1972; am § 20 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 8 ch 82 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For absentee and questioned voting, see 6 AAC 25, art. 3.

Sec. 15.07.150.
Appeals from denial of registration.

When a person is refused registration by a registration official, the official shall at the time of the refusal give to the registration applicant, in writing, the reason or reasons for the refusal.
The person shall have the right to an immediate appeal to the area election supervisor, which appeal may be taken informally, and either verbally or in writing. When a voter is refused registration by an area election supervisor the action shall be reviewed by the superior court of the judicial district; the area election supervisor shall file a petition with the superior court for a judicial determination.
If the petition is filed within 45 days before the date of a statewide election, the petition shall be given precedence over other matters pending before the court.

History.

(§ 2 ch 211 SLA 1968)